Massachusetts, session 194th, S393.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (3) of subsection (i) of section 89 of chapter 71 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the third
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
If a district is no longer in the lowest 10 per cent, the net school spending cap shall be 9
per cent, unless the district net school spending was above 9 per cent in the year prior to moving
out of the lowest 10 per cent in which case the net school spending cap shall remain at the actual
spending level plus enrollment previously approved by the board; provided, that for the purposes
of a regional charter school, enrollment previously approved by the board shall mean the actual
of 3

enrollment of students from a district as a portion of the total enrollment previously approved by
the board for the regional charter school. The department shall determine and make available to
the public a list of the school districts in said lowest 10 per cent.
The department shall not approve any additional seats for charter schools that originate
from a sending district that moved out of the lowest 10 per cent if the net school spending cap of
the sending district was above 9 per cent at the time that the sending school district moved out of
the lowest 10 per cent, provided that any district costs related to seats previously approved in
contradiction to this paragraph shall be borne by the department.
The department shall provide the total tuition amount owed by the sending district
calculated for each enrolled charter school student from a district that is no longer in the lowest
10 per cent who was permitted to enroll notwithstanding the net school spending cap. The
department shall not require a charter school or the district to reimburse the department for said
tuition amount. The state treasurer shall not deduct the tuition amount from the district’s state
school aid, as defined in section 2 of chapter 70 of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide the
total tuition amount owed by the sending district calculated pursuant to section 89 of chapter 71
of the General Laws for each enrolled charter school student from a district that is no longer in
the lowest 10 per cent pursuant to said section 89 of said chapter 71 who was permitted to enroll
notwithstanding the net school spending cap. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall not require a charter school or the district to reimburse the department for said
tuition amount. The state treasurer shall not deduct the tuition amount from the district’s state
school aid, as defined in section 2 of chapter 70 of the General Laws.
of 3

SECTION 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a charter school to unenroll
any student currently in attendance on or before August 1, 2024.
of 3